Indiana, session 2026, HB1373.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-16.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 16.5. (a) As used in this section, "covered
individual" means an individual who is entitled to coverage under a
state employee health plan.
(b) As used in this section, "mastectomy" means the removal of all
or part of a breast for reasons that are determined by a licensed
physician to be medically necessary.
(c) A state employee health plan that provides coverage for a
mastectomy must provide coverage as required under 29 U.S.C. 1185b,
including coverage for:
(1) prosthetic devices; and
(2) reconstructive surgery incident to a mastectomy including:
(A) all stages of reconstruction of the breast on which the
mastectomy has been performed;
(B) surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to produce
symmetry; and
(C) chest wall reconstruction and aesthetic flat closure (as
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


defined by the National Cancer Institute);
in the manner determined by the attending physician and the
covered individual to be appropriate.
(d) In addition to the coverage required by 29 U.S.C. 1185b, a state
employee health plan that provides coverage for a mastectomy must
provide coverage for:
(1) custom fabricated breast prostheses; and
(2) one (1) additional breast prosthesis per breast affected by the
mastectomy.
(e) Coverage required under this section is subject to:
(1) the deductible and coinsurance provisions applicable to a
mastectomy; and
(2) all other terms and conditions applicable to other benefits.
(f) A state employee health plan must provide to a covered
individual, when the individual's coverage under the state employee
health plan begins and annually thereafter, written notice of the
coverage required under this section. Notice that is sent by the state
employee health plan that meets the requirements set forth in 29 U.S.C.
1185b constitutes compliance with this subsection.
(g) The coverage required under this section applies to a state
employee health plan that provides coverage for a mastectomy,
regardless of whether an individual who:
(1) underwent a mastectomy; and
(2) is covered under the state employee health plan;
was covered under the state employee health plan at the time of the
mastectomy.
(h) Except as provided in subsection (c)(2)(C) and subsection (d),
this section does not require a state employee health plan to provide
coverage related to postmastectomy care that exceeds the coverage
required for postmastectomy care under federal law.
SECTION 2. IC 5-10-8-16.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16.6. (a) This section applies to a state
employee health plan that is established, entered into, amended, or
renewed after December 31, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "breast reconstruction surgery"
means all stages of surgery and revisions to repair physical defects
and restore losses of function caused by the extirpation or medical
treatment of breast tissue following trauma, the loss of breast
tissue due to congenital or noncongenital diseases, a
breast-conserving disease treatment surgery including,
lumpectomy, wide local incision, segmental mastectomy, and
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


quadrantectomy, a mastectomy, or surgical prophylaxis against a
future disease of the breast. The term includes the following:
(1) Augmentation or reduction.
(2) All states of primary and revision surgery to reconstruct
a breast mound or to create a new breast mound.
(3) All procedures for a non-diseased contralateral breast
necessary for symmetry between two (2) breasts.
(4) All breast reconstruction modalities, including:
(A) implant-based breast reconstruction;
(B) tissue-based breast reconstruction; and
(C) any breast reconstruction modalities developed after
January 1, 2027, that are:
(i) recognized within Level I of the Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System codes; and
(ii) determined by the commissioner to qualify for
coverage under this section.
(5) All types of breast reconstruction contained within the
modalities under subdivision (4), including:
(A) immediate implant-based breast reconstruction;
(B) delayed implant-based breast reconstruction;
(C) myocutaneous flap tissue-based breast reconstruction;
(D) microvascular free flap tissue-based breast
reconstruction;
(E) structural fat grafting tissue-based breast
reconstruction;
(F) combined implant-based and tissue-based breast
reconstruction; and
(G) any type of breast reconstruction developed after
January 1, 2027, that is:
(i) recognized within Level I of the Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System codes; and
(ii) determined by the commissioner to qualify for
coverage under this section.
(6) All procedural variations, iterations, or approaches
associated with the breast reconstruction types under
subdivision (5), as noted within the short descriptor or the
description for the Level I Healthcare Common Procedure
Coding System code covering the modalities and types of
breast reconstruction.
(7) Chest wall reconstruction, including an aesthetic flat
closure.
(8) Custom fabricated breast prostheses, including
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


replacement of the breast prostheses.
(9) Hybrid procedures that involve both an autologous breast
reconstruction procedure and biologic or synthetic products
and devices.
(10) Mechanical, medical, and surgical prophylaxis to prevent
physical complications of a mastectomy, breast conserving
surgery, chest wall reconstruction, radiation, or lymph node
surgery.
(11) Mechanical, medical, and surgical treatment of physical
complications of a mastectomy, breast conserving surgery,
chest wall reconstruction, radiation, or lymph node surgery.
(c) As used in this section, "commissioner" means the insurance
commissioner appointed under IC 27-1-1-2.
(d) As used in this section, "covered individual" means an
individual entitled to coverage under a state employee health plan.
(e) As used in this section, "health care professional" means a
person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the
laws of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course
of the practice of the person's profession.
(f) As used in this section, "health care professional
reimbursement rate" means the amount paid to a health care
professional by a state employee health plan for health care
services.
(g) As used in this section, "health care service" means an item
or service provided to an individual for the purposes of alleviating,
curing, healing, or preventing human illness, injury, or physical
disability.
(h) As used in this section, "mastectomy" means the removal of
all or part of the breast for reasons that are determined by a
licensed physician to be medically necessary.
(i) As used in this section, "out of network provider" means a
health care professional who:
(1) provides health care services to a covered individual; and
(2) is not a participating provider.
(j) As used in this section, "participating provider" means a
health care professional who has a health care contract with a
contracting entity to provide health care services to a covered
individual with the expectation of receiving payment either directly
from the contracting entity or from a state employee health plan
affiliated with the contracting entity.
(k) As used in this section, "state employee health plan" means
a:
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


(1) self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter; or
(2) contract with a prepaid health care delivery plan entered
into under section 7(c) of this chapter;
to provide group health coverage for state employees.
(l) A state employee health plan shall do the following:
(1) Provide coverage for:
(A) any breast reconstruction surgery that is determined
as the best course of treatment by a health care
professional, consistent with prevailing medical standards,
and in consultation with the covered individual; and
(B) all modalities, types, and techniques of a health care
service provided for the breast reconstruction surgery.
(2) Provide access to an adequate breast reconstruction
surgeon network.
(m) An adequate breast reconstruction surgeon network must
include, for each modality, type, and technique of breast
reconstruction surgery, a provider network consisting of:
(1) for a state employee health plan with less than twenty
thousand (20,000) female covered individuals, at least one (1)
physician; or
(2) for a state employee health plan with twenty thousand
(20,000) female covered individuals or more, at least one (1)
physician for every twenty thousand (20,000) female covered
individuals;
who is a participating provider that actively submits claims that
include a Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System Level I
code covering the breast reconstruction modality, type, and
technique. The commissioner shall develop exceptions to these
requirements for counties that do not have any physicians with the
Medicare provider taxonomy codes 2086S0122X and 208200000X.
(n) The coverage for breast reconstruction surgery under this
section:
(1) is subject to policy deductibles, copayment requirements,
or coinsurance requirements of a state employee health plan
at a cost that is not more than the costs associated with the
state employee health plan's in network rate for the health
care service;
(2) may not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under a state employee health plan; and
(3) may not affect a covered individual's eligibility or
continued eligibility to enroll or renew coverage under the
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


terms of the state employee health plan solely for the purpose
of avoiding the requirements of this section.
(o) If a covered individual is forced to use an out of network
provider due to a state employee health plan's network inadequacy,
the covered individual's financial responsibility must remain at an
in network rate.
(p) If a state employee health plan does not have a participating
provider who provides breast reconstruction surgery, the state
employee health plan shall:
(1) automatically approve a single case agreement for an out
of network provider to provide breast reconstruction surgery
that is determined as the best course of treatment by a health
care professional, consistent with prevailing medical
standards, and in consultation with the covered individual;
(2) reimburse the out of network provider who performs
breast reconstruction surgery at an amount that is the lesser
of:
(A) the health care professional's billed charges for the
health care services; or
(B) the eightieth percentile of all charges for the particular
health care service:
(i) performed by a health care professional in the same
or similar specialty; and
(ii) provided in the same or similar geographical area as
reported in a benchmarking data base maintained by a
nonprofit organization that is not affiliated with,
financially supported by, or otherwise supported by the
state employee health plan.
(q) The following apply if a state employee health plan does not
reimburse an out of network provider as required under this
section:
(1) The state employee health plan, in addition to making the
required payment for the health care services, shall pay the
out of network provider an amount that is three (3) times the
difference between:
(A) the initial payment, or in the case of a notice of denial
of payment, zero dollars ($0); and
(B) the out of network reimbursement rate required under
this section, less any cost sharing required to be paid by the
covered individual.
(2) The payment that is required under subdivision (1) is
subject to interest in a manner specified by the commissioner.
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


(r) A state employee health plan may not, by contract or any
other means, implement or enforce any system of referral that
materially impedes a covered individual's access to breast
reconstruction surgery, including:
(1) causing an undue delay in service by requiring a waiting
period for the covered individual to receive breast
reconstruction surgery that exceeds the clinically appropriate
time frame, as determined by the referring health care
professional in accordance with established medical
standards; and
(2) requiring the covered individual to travel an unreasonable
distance for the breast reconstruction surgery, accounting for
the covered individual's medical condition and available
transportation resources.
(s) A state employee health plan shall provide to a covered
individual, at the time the policy is issued and annually thereafter,
written notice of the coverage required under this section. Notice
sent by a state employee health plan that meets the requirements
set forth in 29 U.S.C. 1185b constitutes compliance with this
subsection.
(t) The provisions of this section may not be waived by contract.
A contractual arrangement or action taken in conflict with this
section or that purports to waive any requirement of this section is
void.
(u) This section may not be used by a state employee health plan
to lower reimbursement rates for other health care services
involving breast reconstruction provided by a participating
provider.
(v) The commissioner shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement and administer this section.
SECTION 3. IC 27-1-37.5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2025,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. (a) Except as provided in subsection
(b), this section applies to a claim for a health care service rendered by
a health care provider:
(1) for which:
(A) prior authorization is requested after June 30, 2025; and
(B) a utilization review entity gives prior authorization; and
(2) that is rendered in accordance with the authorization.
(b) This section does not apply to a claim for breast
reconstruction surgery that is subject to section 12.5 of this
chapter.
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


(b) (c) The utilization review entity shall not deny the claim
described in subsection (a) unless:
(1) the health care provider knowingly and materially
misrepresented the health care service in the prior authorization
request with the specific intent to deceive and obtain an unlawful
payment from the utilization review entity;
(2) the health care service was no longer a covered benefit on the
date the health care service was provided;
(3) the health care provider was no longer contracted with the
patient's health plan on the date the health care service was
provided;
(4) the health care provider failed to meet the utilization review
entity's timely filing requirements;
(5) the utilization review entity does not have liability for the
claim; or
(6) the patient was not covered under the health plan on the date
on which the health care service was rendered.
(c) (d) If:
(1) the claim described in subsection (a) contains an unintentional
and inaccurate inconsistency with the request for prior
authorization; and
(2) the inconsistency results in denial of the claim;
the health care provider may resubmit the claim with accurate,
corrected information.
SECTION 4. IC 27-1-37.5-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12.5. (a) This section applies
to a claim for breast reconstruction surgery rendered by a health
care provider:
(1) for which:
(A) prior authorization is requested after December 31,
2026; and
(B) a utilization review entity gives prior authorization;
and
(2) that is rendered in accordance with the authorization.
(b) As used in this section, "breast reconstruction surgery" has
the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-5-26.1.
(c) A utilization review entity may not deny a claim described in
subsection (a) unless the utilization review entity provides a formal
declaration of compelling evidence of health care provider fraud
in the prior authorization or claim submission process.
SECTION 5. IC 27-8-5-0.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


SECTION 435, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 0.1. The following
amendments to this chapter apply as follows:
(1) The amendments made to section 1 of this chapter by
P.L.257-1985 apply to insurance policies issued after December
31, 1985.
(2) The amendments made to section 21 of this chapter by
P.L.98-1990 apply to a policy issued for delivery in Indiana after
June 30, 1990.
(3) The addition of section 23 of this chapter by P.L.152-1990
applies to a statute or rule mandating the offering of health care
coverage enacted or adopted after December 31, 1990.
(4) The amendments made to section 23 of this chapter by
P.L.119-1991 apply to an insurance policy that is issued or
renewed after June 30, 1991.
(5) The addition of section 2.5 of this chapter by P.L.93-1995
applies to all individual accident and sickness policies issued or
renewed after December 31, 1997.
(6) The addition of section 2.6 of this chapter (before its repeal)
by P.L.93-1995 applies to all individual accident and sickness
policies issued or renewed after December 31, 1995.
(7) The amendments made to sections 3 and 19 of this chapter by
P.L.91-1998 apply to all accident and sickness policies in force on
April 1, 1998.
(8) The amendments made to section 26 of this chapter (before
its repeal) by P.L.204-2003 apply to a policy of accident and
sickness insurance that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed
after June 30, 2003.
(9) The amendments made to section 15.6 of this chapter by
P.L.226-2003 apply to a policy of accident and sickness insurance
that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2003.
(10) The amendments made to section 2.5 of this chapter by
P.L.127-2006 apply to a certificate of coverage under a
nonemployer based association group policy of accident and
sickness insurance that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed
after June 30, 2006.
(11) The amendments made to section 16.5 of this chapter by
P.L.127-2006 apply to a certificate of coverage under a
nonemployer based association group policy of accident and
sickness insurance that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed
after June 30, 2006.
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


(12) The amendments made to section 19 of this chapter by
P.L.127-2006 apply to a certificate of coverage under a
nonemployer based association group policy of accident and
sickness insurance that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed
after June 30, 2006.
(13) The amendments made to section 3 of this chapter by
P.L.98-2007 apply to a policy of accident and sickness insurance
that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after December 31,
2007.
(14) The amendments made to section 2 of this chapter by
P.L.218-2007 apply to a policy of accident and sickness insurance
that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2007.
(15) The addition of section 28 of this chapter by P.L.218-2007
applies to a policy of accident and sickness insurance that is
issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2007.
SECTION 6. IC 27-8-5-16.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.11-2011,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16.5. (a) As used in this section, "delivery
state" means any state other than Indiana in which a policy is delivered
or issued for delivery.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), (d), or (e), a certificate may
not be issued to a resident of Indiana pursuant to a group policy that is
delivered or issued for delivery in a state other than Indiana.
(c) A certificate may be issued to a resident of Indiana pursuant to
a group policy not described in subsection (d) that is delivered or
issued for delivery in a state other than Indiana if:
(1) the delivery state has a law substantially similar to section 16
of this chapter;
(2) the delivery state has approved the group policy; and
(3) the policy or the certificate contains provisions that are:
(A) substantially similar to the provisions required by:
(i) section 19 of this chapter;
(ii) section 21 of this chapter; and
(iii) IC 27-8-5.6; and
(B) consistent with the requirements set forth in:
(i) section 24 of this chapter;
(ii) IC 27-8-6;
(iii) IC 27-8-14;
(iv) IC 27-8-23;
(v) 760 IAC 1-38.1; and
(vi) 760 IAC 1-39.
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


(d) A certificate may be issued to a resident of Indiana under an
association group policy, a discretionary group policy, or a trust group
policy that is delivered or issued for delivery in a state other than
Indiana if:
(1) the delivery state has a law substantially similar to section 16
of this chapter;
(2) the delivery state has approved the group policy; and
(3) the policy or the certificate contains provisions that are:
(A) substantially similar to the provisions required by:
(i) section 19 of this chapter or, if the policy or certificate is
described in section 2.5(b)(2) of this chapter, section 2.5 of
this chapter;
(ii) section 19.3 of this chapter if the policy or certificate
contains a waiver of coverage;
(iii) section 21 of this chapter; and
(iv) IC 27-8-5.6; and
(B) consistent with the requirements set forth in:
(i) section 15.6 of this chapter;
(ii) section 24 of this chapter;
(iii) section 26 26.1 of this chapter;
(iv) IC 27-8-6;
(v) IC 27-8-14;
(vi) IC 27-8-14.1;
(vii) IC 27-8-14.5;
(viii) IC 27-8-14.7;
(ix) IC 27-8-14.8;
(x) IC 27-8-20;
(xi) IC 27-8-23;
(xii) IC 27-8-24.3;
(xiii) IC 27-8-26;
(xiv) IC 27-8-28;
(xv) IC 27-8-29;
(xvi) 760 IAC 1-38.1; and
(xvii) 760 IAC 1-39.
(e) A certificate may be issued to a resident of Indiana pursuant to
a group policy that is delivered or issued for delivery in a state other
than Indiana if the commissioner determines that the policy pursuant
to which the certificate is issued meets the requirements set forth in
section 17(a) of this chapter.
(f) This section does not affect any other provision of Indiana law
governing the terms or benefits of coverage provided to a resident of
Indiana under any certificate or policy of insurance.
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


SECTION 7. IC 27-8-5-26 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 26. (a) As used in this section, "mastectomy"
means the removal of all or part of the breast for reasons that are
determined by a licensed physician to be medically necessary.
(b) A policy of accident and sickness insurance that provides
coverage for a mastectomy may not be issued, amended, delivered, or
renewed in Indiana unless the policy provides coverage as required
under 29 U.S.C. 1185b, including coverage for:
(1) prosthetic devices; and
(2) reconstructive surgery incident to a mastectomy including:
(A) all stages of reconstruction of the breast on which the
mastectomy has been performed;
(B) surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to produce
symmetry; and
(C) chest wall reconstruction, including aesthetic flat closure
(as defined by the National Cancer Institute);
in the manner determined by the attending physician and the
patient to be appropriate.
(c) In addition to the coverage required by 29 U.S.C. 1185b, a policy
of accident and sickness insurance that provides coverage for a
mastectomy must provide coverage for:
(1) custom fabricated breast prostheses; and
(2) one (1) additional breast prosthesis per breast affected by the
mastectomy.
(d) Coverage required under this section is subject to:
(1) the deductible and coinsurance provisions applicable to a
mastectomy; and
(2) all other terms and conditions applicable to other benefits.
(e) An insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
insurance shall provide to an insured, at the time the policy is issued
and annually thereafter, written notice of the coverage required under
this section. Notice that is sent by the insurer that meets the
requirements set forth in 29 U.S.C. 1185b constitutes compliance with
this subsection.
(f) The coverage required under this section applies to a policy of
accident and sickness insurance that provides coverage for a
mastectomy, regardless of whether an individual who:
(1) underwent a mastectomy; and
(2) is covered under the policy;
was covered under the policy at the time of the mastectomy.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2)(C) and subsection (c),
this section does not require an insurer to provide coverage related to
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


post mastectomy care that exceeds the coverage required for post
mastectomy care under federal law.
SECTION 8. IC 27-8-5-26.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 26.1. (a) This section applies to a policy of
accident and sickness insurance that is issued, entered into,
amended, or renewed after December 31, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "breast reconstruction surgery"
means all stages of surgery and revisions to repair physical defects
and restore losses of function caused by the extirpation or medical
treatment of breast tissue following trauma, the loss of breast
tissue due to congenital or noncongenital diseases, a
breast-conserving disease treatment surgery including,
lumpectomy, wide local incision, segmental mastectomy, and
quadrantectomy, a mastectomy, or surgical prophylaxis against a
future disease of the breast. The term includes the following:
(1) Augmentation or reduction.
(2) All states of primary and revision surgery to reconstruct
a breast mound or to create a new breast mound.
(3) All procedures for a non-diseased contralateral breast
necessary for symmetry between two (2) breasts.
(4) All breast reconstruction modalities, including:
(A) implant-based breast reconstruction;
(B) tissue-based breast reconstruction; and
(C) any breast reconstruction modalities developed after
January 1, 2027, that are:
(i) recognized within Level I of the Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System codes; and
(ii) determined by the commissioner to qualify for
coverage under this section.
(5) All types of breast reconstruction contained within the
modalities under subdivision (4), including:
(A) immediate implant-based breast reconstruction;
(B) delayed implant-based breast reconstruction;
(C) myocutaneous flap tissue-based breast reconstruction;
(D) microvascular free flap tissue-based breast
reconstruction;
(E) structural fat grafting tissue-based breast
reconstruction;
(F) combined implant-based and tissue-based breast
reconstruction; and
(G) any type of breast reconstruction developed after
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


January 1, 2027, that is:
(i) recognized within Level I of the Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System codes; and
(ii) determined by the commissioner to qualify for
coverage under this section.
(6) All procedural variations, iterations, or approaches
associated with the breast reconstruction types under
subdivision (5), as noted within the short descriptor or the
description for the Level I Healthcare Common Procedure
Coding System code covering the modalities and types of
breast reconstruction.
(7) Chest wall reconstruction, including an aesthetic flat
closure.
(8) Custom fabricated breast prostheses, including
replacement of the breast prostheses.
(9) Hybrid procedures that involve both an autologous breast
reconstruction procedure and biologic or synthetic products
and devices.
(10) Mechanical, medical, and surgical prophylaxis to prevent
physical complications of a mastectomy, breast conserving
surgery, chest wall reconstruction, radiation, or lymph node
surgery.
(11) Mechanical, medical, and surgical treatment of physical
complications of a mastectomy, breast conserving surgery,
chest wall reconstruction, radiation, or lymph node surgery.
(c) As used in this section, "commissioner" means the insurance
commissioner appointed under IC 27-1-1-2.
(d) As used in this section, "health care professional" means a
person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the
laws of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course
of the practice of the person's profession.
(e) As used in this section, "health care professional
reimbursement rate" means the amount paid to a health care
professional by an insurer for health care services.
(f) As used in this section, "health care service" means an item
or service provided to an individual for the purposes of alleviating,
curing, healing, or preventing human illness, injury, or physical
disability.
(g) As used in this section, "insured" means an individual
entitled to coverage under a policy of accident and sickness
insurance.
(h) As used in this section, "insurer" means an insurer (as
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


defined in IC 27-1-2-3(x)) that issues a policy of accident and
sickness insurance.
(i) As used in this section, "mastectomy" means the removal of
all or part of the breast for reasons that are determined by a
licensed physician to be medically necessary.
(j) As used in this section, "out of network provider" means a
health care professional who:
(1) provides health care services to an insured; and
(2) is not a participating provider.
(k) As used in this section, "participating provider" means a
health care professional who has a health care contract with a
contracting entity to provide health care services to an insured
with the expectation of receiving payment either directly from the
contracting entity or from an insurer affiliated with the
contracting entity.
(l) As used in this section, "policy of accident and sickness
insurance" does not include a policy, plan, or coverage set forth in
IC 27-8-5-2.5(a).
(m) A policy of accident and sickness insurance shall do the
following:
(1) Provide coverage for:
(A) any breast reconstruction surgery that is determined
as the best course of treatment by a health care
professional, consistent with prevailing medical standards,
and in consultation with the insured; and
(B) all modalities, types, and techniques of a health care
service provided for the breast reconstruction surgery.
(2) Provide access to an adequate breast reconstruction
surgeon network.
(n) An adequate breast reconstruction surgeon network must
include, for each modality, type, and technique of breast
reconstruction surgery, a provider network consisting of:
(1) for a policy of accident and sickness insurance with less
than twenty thousand (20,000) female insureds, at least one (1)
physician; or
(2) for a policy of accident and sickness insurance with twenty
thousand (20,000) female insureds or more, at least one (1)
physician for every twenty thousand (20,000) female insureds;
who is a participating provider that actively submits claims that
include a Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System Level I
code covering the breast reconstruction modality, type, and
technique. The commissioner shall develop exceptions to these
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


requirements for counties that do not have any physicians with the
Medicare provider taxonomy codes 2086S0122X and 208200000X.
(o) The coverage for breast reconstruction surgery under this
section:
(1) is subject to policy deductibles, copayment requirements,
or coinsurance requirements of an insurer at a cost that is not
more than the costs associated with the policy of accident and
sickness insurance's in network rate for the health care
service;
(2) may not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under a policy of accident and sickness insurance; and
(3) may not affect an insured's eligibility or continued
eligibility to enroll or renew coverage under the terms of the
policy of accident and sickness insurance solely for the
purpose of avoiding the requirements of this section.
(p) If an insured is forced to use an out of network provider due
to an insurer's network inadequacy, the insured's financial
responsibility must remain at an in network rate.
(q) If an insurer does not have a participating provider who
provides breast reconstruction surgery, the insurer shall:
(1) automatically approve a single case agreement for an out
of network provider to provide breast reconstruction surgery
that is determined as the best course of treatment by a health
care professional, consistent with prevailing medical
standards, and in consultation with the insured;
(2) reimburse the out of network provider who performs
breast reconstruction surgery at an amount that is the lesser
of:
(A) the health care professional's billed charges for the
health care services; or
(B) the eightieth percentile of all charges for the particular
health care service:
(i) performed by a health care professional in the same
or similar specialty; and
(ii) provided in the same or similar geographical area as
reported in a benchmarking data base maintained by a
nonprofit organization that is not affiliated with,
financially supported by, or otherwise supported by the
insurer.
(r) The following apply if an insurer does not reimburse an out
of network provider as required under this section:
(1) The insurer, in addition to making the required payment
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


for the health care services, shall pay the out of network
provider an amount that is three (3) times the difference
between:
(A) the initial payment, or in the case of a notice of denial
of payment, zero dollars ($0); and
(B) the out of network reimbursement rate required under
this section, less any cost sharing required to be paid by the
insured.
(2) The payment that is required under subdivision (1) is
subject to interest in a manner specified by the commissioner.
(s) An insurer may not, by contract or any other means,
implement or enforce any system of referral that materially
impedes an insured's access to breast reconstruction surgery,
including:
(1) causing an undue delay in service by requiring a waiting
period for the insured to receive breast reconstruction
surgery that exceeds the clinically appropriate time frame, as
determined by the referring health care professional in
accordance with established medical standards; and
(2) requiring the insured to travel an unreasonable distance
for the breast reconstruction surgery, accounting for the
insured's medical condition and available transportation
resources.
(t) An insurer shall provide to an insured, at the time the policy
is issued and annually thereafter, written notice of the coverage
required under this section. Notice sent by the insurer that meets
the requirements set forth in 29 U.S.C. 1185b constitutes
compliance with this subsection.
(u) The provisions of this section may not be waived by contract.
A contractual arrangement or action taken in conflict with this
section or that purports to waive any requirement of this section is
void.
(v) This section may not be used by an insurer to lower
reimbursement rates for other health care services involving breast
reconstruction provided by a participating provider.
(w) The commissioner shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement and administer this section.
SECTION 9. IC 27-13-7-0.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 457, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 0.1. The following
amendments to this chapter apply as follows:
(1) The addition of sections 15.3 and 16 of this chapter by
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


P.L.170-1999 applies to health maintenance organization
contracts that are issued, delivered, or renewed after June 30,
1999.
(2) The addition of section 18 of this chapter by P.L.166-2003
applies to a health maintenance organization contract that is
entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after December 31,
2003.
(3) The amendments made to section 14 of this chapter (before
its repeal) by P.L.204-2003 apply to an individual contract or a
group contract that is entered into, delivered, amended, or
renewed after June 30, 2003.
(4) The amendments made to section 14.8 of this chapter by
P.L.226-2003 apply to a group or an individual contract with a
health maintenance organization that is entered into, delivered,
amended, or renewed after June 30, 2003.
(5) The amendments made to section 14.5 of this chapter by
P.L.196-2005 apply to a health maintenance organization contract
that is entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2005.
(6) The amendments made to section 3 of this chapter by
P.L.218-2007 apply to a health maintenance organization contract
that is entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2007.
(7) The addition of section 19 of this chapter by P.L.109-2008
applies to an individual contract or a group contract that is entered
into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2008.
SECTION 10. IC 27-13-7-14 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 14. (a) As used in this section, "mastectomy"
means the removal of all or part of the breast for reasons that are
determined by a licensed physician to be medically necessary.
(b) A contract with a health maintenance organization that provides
coverage for a mastectomy must provide coverage as required under 29
U.S.C. 1185b, including coverage for:
(1) prosthetic devices; and
(2) reconstructive surgery incident to a mastectomy including:
(A) all stages of reconstruction of the breast on which the
mastectomy has been performed;
(B) surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to produce
symmetry; and
(C) chest wall reconstruction, including aesthetic flat closure
(as defined by the National Cancer Institute);
in the manner determined by the attending physician and the
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


patient to be appropriate.
(c) In addition to the coverage required by 29 U.S.C. 1185b, a health
maintenance organization contract that provides coverage for a
mastectomy must provide coverage for:
(1) custom fabricated breast prostheses; and
(2) one (1) additional breast prosthesis per breast affected by the
mastectomy.
(d) Coverage required under this section is subject to:
(1) the deductible and coinsurance provisions applicable to a
mastectomy; and
(2) all other terms and conditions applicable to other services
under the contract.
(e) A health maintenance organization shall provide to an enrollee,
at the time that an individual contract or a group contract is entered into
and annually thereafter, written notice of the coverage required under
this section. Notice that is sent by the health maintenance organization
that meets the requirements set forth in 29 U.S.C. 1185b constitutes
compliance with this subsection.
(f) The coverage required under this section applies to a contract
with a health maintenance organization that provides coverage for a
mastectomy, regardless of whether an individual who:
(1) underwent a mastectomy; and
(2) is covered under the contract;
was covered under the contract at the time of the mastectomy.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2)(C) and subsection (c),
this section does not require a health maintenance organization to
provide coverage related to post mastectomy care that exceeds the
coverage required for post mastectomy care under federal law.
SECTION 11. IC 27-13-7-14.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14.1. (a) This section applies
to an individual contract or a group contract that is entered into,
amended, or renewed after December 31, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "breast reconstruction surgery"
means all stages of surgery and revisions to repair physical defects
and restore losses of function caused by the extirpation or medical
treatment of breast tissue following trauma, the loss of breast
tissue due to congenital or noncongenital diseases, a
breast-conserving disease treatment surgery including,
lumpectomy, wide local incision, segmental mastectomy, and
quadrantectomy, a mastectomy, or surgical prophylaxis against a
future disease of the breast. The term includes the following:
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


(1) Augmentation or reduction.
(2) All states of primary and revision surgery to reconstruct
a breast mound or to create a new breast mound.
(3) All procedures for a non-diseased contralateral breast
necessary for symmetry between two (2) breasts.
(4) All breast reconstruction modalities, including:
(A) implant-based breast reconstruction;
(B) tissue-based breast reconstruction; and
(C) any breast reconstruction modalities developed after
January 1, 2027, that are:
(i) recognized within Level I of the Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System codes; and
(ii) determined by the commissioner to qualify for
coverage under this section.
(5) All types of breast reconstruction contained within the
modalities under subdivision (4), including:
(A) immediate implant-based breast reconstruction;
(B) delayed implant-based breast reconstruction;
(C) myocutaneous flap tissue-based breast reconstruction;
(D) microvascular free flap tissue-based breast
reconstruction;
(E) structural fat grafting tissue-based breast
reconstruction;
(F) combined implant-based and tissue-based breast
reconstruction; and
(G) any type of breast reconstruction developed after
January 1, 2027, that is:
(i) recognized within Level I of the Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System codes; and
(ii) determined by the commissioner to qualify for
coverage under this section.
(6) All procedural variations, iterations, or approaches
associated with the breast reconstruction types under
subdivision (5), as noted within the short descriptor or the
description for the Level I Healthcare Common Procedure
Coding System code covering the modalities and types of
breast reconstruction.
(7) Chest wall reconstruction, including an aesthetic flat
closure.
(8) Custom fabricated breast prostheses, including
replacement of the breast prostheses.
(9) Hybrid procedures that involve both an autologous breast
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


reconstruction procedure and biologic or synthetic products
and devices.
(10) Mechanical, medical, and surgical prophylaxis to prevent
physical complications of a mastectomy, breast conserving
surgery, chest wall reconstruction, radiation, or lymph node
surgery.
(11) Mechanical, medical, and surgical treatment of physical
complications of a mastectomy, breast conserving surgery,
chest wall reconstruction, radiation, or lymph node surgery.
(c) As used in this section, "health care professional" means a
person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the
laws of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course
of the practice of the person's profession.
(d) As used in this section, "health care professional
reimbursement rate" means the amount paid to a health care
professional by a health maintenance organization for health care
services.
(e) As used in this section, "mastectomy" means the removal of
all or part of the breast for reasons that are determined by a
licensed physician to be medically necessary.
(f) As used in this section, "out of network provider" means a
health care professional who:
(1) provides health care services to an enrollee; and
(2) is not a participating provider.
(g) As used in this section, "participating provider" means a
health care professional who has a health care contract with a
contracting entity to provide health care services to an enrollee
with the expectation of receiving payment either directly from the
contracting entity or from a health maintenance organization
affiliated with the contracting entity.
(h) An individual contract or a group contract shall do the
following:
(1) Provide coverage for:
(A) any breast reconstruction surgery that is determined
as the best course of treatment by a health care
professional, consistent with prevailing medical standards,
and in consultation with the enrollee; and
(B) all modalities, types, and techniques of a health care
service provided for the breast reconstruction surgery.
(2) Provide access to an adequate breast reconstruction
surgeon network.
(i) An adequate breast reconstruction surgeon network must
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


include, for each modality, type, and technique of breast
reconstruction surgery, a provider network consisting of:
(1) for a contract with less than twenty thousand (20,000)
female enrollees, at least one (1) physician; or
(2) for a contract with twenty thousand (20,000) female
enrollees or more, at least one (1) physician for every twenty
thousand (20,000) female enrollees;
who is a participating provider that actively submits claims that
include a Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System Level I
code covering the breast reconstruction modality, type, and
technique. The commissioner shall develop exceptions to these
requirements for counties that do not have any physicians with the
Medicare provider taxonomy codes 2086S0122X and 208200000X.
(j) The coverage for breast reconstruction surgery under this
section:
(1) is subject to policy deductibles, copayment requirements,
or coinsurance requirements of a health maintenance
organization at a cost that is not more than the costs
associated with the health maintenance organization's in
network rate for the health care service;
(2) may not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under an individual contract or a group contract; and
(3) may not affect an enrollee's eligibility or continued
eligibility to enroll or renew coverage under the terms of the
individual contract or group contract solely for the purpose
of avoiding the requirements of this section.
(k) If an enrollee is forced to use an out of network provider due
to a health maintenance organization's network inadequacy, the
enrollee's financial responsibility must remain at an in network
rate.
(l) If a health maintenance organization does not have a
participating provider who provides breast reconstruction surgery,
the health maintenance organization shall:
(1) automatically approve a single case agreement for an out
of network provider to provide breast reconstruction surgery
that is determined as the best course of treatment by a health
care professional, consistent with prevailing medical
standards, and in consultation with the enrollee;
(2) reimburse the out of network provider who performs
breast reconstruction surgery at an amount that is the lesser
of:
(A) the health care professional's billed charges for the
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


health care services; or
(B) the eightieth percentile of all charges for the particular
health care service:
(i) performed by a health care professional in the same
or similar specialty; and
(ii) provided in the same or similar geographical area as
reported in a benchmarking data base maintained by a
nonprofit organization that is not affiliated with,
financially supported by, or otherwise supported by the
health maintenance organization.
(m) The following apply if a health maintenance organization
does not reimburse an out of network provider as required under
this section:
(1) The health maintenance organization, in addition to
making the required payment for the health care services,
shall pay the out of network provider an amount that is three
(3) times the difference between:
(A) the initial payment, or in the case of a notice of denial
of payment, zero dollars ($0); and
(B) the out of network reimbursement rate required under
this section, less any cost sharing required to be paid by the
enrollee.
(2) The payment that is required under subdivision (1) is
subject to interest in a manner specified by the commissioner.
(n) A health maintenance organization may not, by contract or
any other means, implement or enforce any system of referral that
materially impedes an enrollee's access to breast reconstruction
surgery, including:
(1) causing an undue delay in service by requiring a waiting
period for the enrollee to receive breast reconstruction
surgery that exceeds the clinically appropriate time frame, as
determined by the referring health care professional in
accordance with established medical standards; and
(2) requiring the enrollee to travel an unreasonable distance
for the breast reconstruction surgery, accounting for the
enrollee's medical condition and available transportation
resources.
(o) A health maintenance organization shall provide to an
enrollee, at the time the contract is issued and annually thereafter,
written notice of the coverage required under this section. Notice
sent by the health maintenance organization that meets the
requirements set forth in 29 U.S.C. 1185b constitutes compliance
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141


with this subsection.
(p) The provisions of this section may not be waived by contract.
A contractual arrangement or action taken in conflict with this
section or that purports to waive any requirement of this section is
void.
(q) This section may not be used by a health maintenance
organization to lower reimbursement rates for other health care
services involving breast reconstruction provided by a
participating provider.
(r) The commissioner shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement and administer this section.
2026 IN 1373—LS 7070/DI 141